src/fst/stems/exceptions.lexc
LEXICON Exceptions


!! NOUNS

!! KIN TERMS
! +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Com +Cmpr +PxSg3 K
веҥе+N+Sg:веҥым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
веҥе+N+Sg:веҥыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
веҥе+N+Pl:веҥым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
веҥе+N+Pl:веҥыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

оньо+N+Sg:оньым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
оньо+N+Sg:оньыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
оньо+N+Pl:оньым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
оньо+N+Pl:оньыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

чӱчӱ+N+Sg:чӱчӱм N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
чӱчӱ+N+Sg:чӱчӱч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
чӱчӱ+N+Pl:чӱчӱм-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
чӱчӱ+N+Pl:чӱчӱч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

чӱчӱньӧ+N+Sg:чӱчӱньым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
чӱчӱньӧ+N+Sg:чӱчӱньыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
чӱчӱньӧ+N+Pl:чӱчӱньым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
чӱчӱньӧ+N+Pl:чӱчӱньыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

шешке+N+Sg:шешкым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
шешке+N+Sg:шешкыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
шешке+N+Pl:шешкым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
шешке+N+Pl:шешкыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

шольо+N+Sg:шольым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
шольо+N+Sg:шольыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
шольо+N+Pl:шольым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
шольо+N+Pl:шольыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

иза-шольо+N+Sg:иза-шольым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
иза-шольо+N+Sg:иза-шольыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
иза-шольо+N+Pl:иза-шольым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
иза-шольо+N+Pl:иза-шольыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

эрге+N+Sg:эргым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1;
эрге+N+Sg:эргыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
эрге+N+Pl:эргым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1;
эрге+N+Pl:эргыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

нудо+N+Sg:нудым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
нудо+N+Sg:нудыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
нудо+N+Pl:нудым-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
нудо+N+Pl:нудыч-влак N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;


!! Single-syllable nouns in У Ӱ Ю
лу:лу N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ну:ну N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
пу:пу N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ру:ру N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ту:ту N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
шу:шу N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
кӱ:кӱ N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ю:ю N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
у+A+Der/MWN:у N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;

!! VERBS
манаш+V+Ger+Gen:ман K ;

LEXICON N_KIN_SPECIAL ! will this work?
N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

LEXICON N_KIN_SPECIAL_1
+Nom+PxSg1: K ;
+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ын K ;
+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ым K ;
+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC:%>лан K ;
+Com+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ге K ;
+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ла K ;

LEXICON N_KIN_SPECIAL_2
+Nom+PxSg2: K ;
+Gen+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ын K ;
+Acc+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ым K ;
+Dat+PxSg2+So/PC:%>лан K ;
+Com+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ге K ;
+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ла K ;

!! NOUNS
веельзевул+N:веельзевул N_ ;
пенгыд+N:пенгыд N_ ;
динарий+N:динарий N_ ;
лампыпӱкен+N:лампыпӱкен N_ ;
диавол+N:диавол N_ ;
смоква+N: смоква N_ ;
равви+N:равви N_ ;
благословит+N:благословит N_ ;
жертвенник+N:жертвенник N_ ;
пресвитер+N:пресвитер N_ ;
старец+N:старец N_ ;
эллин+N:эллин N_ ;
кесарий+N:кесарий N_ ;



!! PROPER NAMES
Воанергес+N:Воанергес N_ ;

Геннисарет:Геннисарет PROP-PLC_ ;
Вифсаида:Вифсаида PROP-PLC_ ;
Галилея:Галилей%{аы%} PROP-PLC_ ;
Кананит:Кананит PROP-PLC_ ;
Гоморра:Гоморра PROP-PLC_ ;
Иродиада:Иродиада PROP-PLC_ ;
Капернаума:Капернау•м%{аы%} PROP-PLC_ ;
Македоний:Македоний PROP-PLC_ ;
Финикий:Финикий PROP-PLC_ ;


Аполлос:Аполлос LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Гадара:Гадара LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Елеон:Елеон LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Захарий:Захарий LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Иаир:Иаир LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Иосий:Иосий LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Исаия:Исаия LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Идумей:Идумей LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Кириней:Кириней LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Каиафа:Каиафа LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Вифсаида:Вифсаида LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Вифаний:Вифаний LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Симеон:Симеон LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Иосий:Иосий LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Иона:Иона LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Лазарь:Лазарь LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Матфей:Матфей LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Назорей:Назорей LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Сидон:Сидон LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;
Фома:Фома LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL ;

Авиафар:Авиафар LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL "" ;
